Maryland, session 2026, HB1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
5–602.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person may not:
(1) distribute or dispense a controlled dangerous substance; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1361*

HOUSE BILL 1361
(2) possess a controlled dangerous substance other than cannabis in
sufficient quantity reasonably to indicate under all circumstances an intent to distribute or
dispense a controlled dangerous substance.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person may not possess
cannabis in sufficient quantity reasonably to indicate under all circumstances an intent to
distribute or dispense cannabis.
(2) Possession of the civil use amount of cannabis or the personal use
amount of cannabis without other evidence of an intent to distribute or dispense does not
constitute a violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) (1) (i) In this subsection, “adult sharing” means transferring cannabis
between persons who are 21 years of age or older without remuneration.
(ii) “Adult sharing” does not include instances in which:
1. cannabis is given away contemporaneously with another
reciprocal transaction between the same parties;
2. a gift of cannabis is offered or advertised in conjunction
with an offer for the sale of goods or services; or
3. a gift of cannabis is contingent on a separate reciprocal
transaction for goods or services.
(2) This section does not prohibit, and no civil or criminal penalty may be
imposed for, adult sharing of the personal use amount of cannabis.
(D) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT CONSPIRE TO COMMIT A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON
WHO IS CONVICTED FOR CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT A VIOLATION DESCRIBED IN THIS
SECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE SAME PENALTY AS THE UNDERLYING OFFENSE.
5–611.
(A) FOR PURPOSES OF VENUE, ANY VIOLATION OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE OR THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE COMMITTED IN FURTHERANCE OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS CONSIDERED TO HAVE BEEN COMMITTED IN ANY
COUNTY:
(1) IN WHICH ANY ACT WAS PERFORMED IN FURTHERANCE OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1361 3
(2) THAT IS THE PRINCIPAL PLACE OF THE OPERATIONS OF THE
CONSPIRACY IN THE STATE;
(3) IN WHICH A DEFENDANT HAD CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF
PROCEEDS OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE OR OF RECORDS OR OTHER
MATERIAL OR OBJECTS THAT WERE USED IN FURTHERANCE OF A VIOLATION; OR
(4) IN WHICH A DEFENDANT RESIDES.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, IN
CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS ALLEGED TO HAVE
BEEN COMMITTED IN MORE THAN ONE COUNTY, THE RESPECTIVE STATE’S
ATTORNEY OF EACH COUNTY, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, MAY JOIN THE CAUSES
OF ACTION IN A SINGLE COMPLAINT WITH THE CONSENT OF EACH STATE’S
ATTORNEY HAVING JURISDICTION OVER AN OFFENSE SOUGHT TO BE JOINED.
9–807.
For purposes of venue, any violation of this subtitle, OR A VIOLATION OF THIS
ARTICLE OR THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE COMMITTED IN FURTHERANCE OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, is considered to have been committed in any county:
(1) in which any act was performed in furtherance of a violation of this
subtitle;
(2) that is the principal place of the operations of the criminal organization
in the State;
(3) in which a defendant had control or possession of proceeds of a violation
of this subtitle or of records or other material or objects that were used in furtherance of a
violation; or
(4) in which a defendant resides.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.